code/porter_recast_as_lovins.sbl
integers ( p1 p2 )
booleans ( Y_found )

routines (
    endings respell
    shortv
    undouble
    A B C D E F G H I J
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WXY )

define v        'aeiouy'
define v_WXY    v + 'wxY'

backwardmode (

    define shortv as ( non-v_WXY v non-v )

    define undouble as (
        among ('bb' 'dd' 'ff' 'gg' 'mm' 'nn' 'pp' 'rr' 'tt')
        and ([next] delete)
    )

    define A as $p1 <= cursor
    define B as $p2 <= cursor
    define C as (B 's' or 't')
    define D as (B not 'm')
    define E as ('e' or 'ous' A)

    define F as ('ss' or 'i')
    define G as not 's'
    define H as gopast v
    define I as (not 'e' gopast v)
    define J as ('ee' A)

    define endings as (

        [substring] among (

            'ed'   I
            'ing'  H
            'ings' H

                   (delete
                    undouble or (atmark p1  test shortv  insert 'e')
                   )

            'd'    J
            'es'   F
            's'    G

            get '/home/martin/Snowball/festschrift/endings'
                   (delete)
        )
    )

    define respell as (
        [substring] among (
            'e'     (B or (A not shortv) delete)
            'l'     (B 'l' delete)
            'enci'
            'ency'  ((A <- 'enc') or <- 'enci')
            'anci'
            'ancy'  ((A <- 'anc') or <- 'anci')
            'ally'  ((A <- 'al') or <- 'alli')
            'ently' ((A <- 'ent') or <- 'entli')
            'ator'  (A <- 'at')

            'logi'
            'logy'  ((A <- 'log') or <- 'logi')
            'bli'
            'bly'   ((A <- 'bl') or <- 'bli')
            'bil'   (v A <- 'bl')
            'y' 'Y'
                    (gopast v  <-'i')

        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    test hop 3
    unset Y_found
    do ( ['y'] <-'Y' set Y_found)
    do repeat(goto (v ['y']) <-'Y' set Y_found)

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do(
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )

    backwards (
        do endings
        do respell
    )
    do(Y_found  repeat(goto (['Y']) <-'y'))

)
